DTC P0098 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]
id0102f1803000
DTC P0098 |
Intake air temperature (IAT) sensor No.2 circuit high input |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The PCM monitors the input signal from intake air temperature sensor No.2. If the voltage from intake air temperature sensor No.2 is more than 4.9 V, the PCM determines that there is a malfunction in the intake air temperature sensor No.2 circuit.
Diagnostic support note
• The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in the first drive cycle.
• FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
• The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• IAT sensor No.2 malfunction
• Connector or terminal malfunction
• Open circuit in wiring harness between IAT sensor No.2 terminal A and PCM terminal 79
• Short to power supply in wiring harness between IAT sensor No.2 terminal A and PCM terminal 79
• Open circuit in wiring harness between IAT sensor No.2 terminal B and PCM terminal 74
• PCM malfunction
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related service repair information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERN TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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4
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INSPECT IAT SENSOR NO.2 CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Disconnect the IAT sensor No.2 connector.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the terminal, then go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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5
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INSPECT IAT SENSOR NO.2 SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO POWER SUPPLY
• Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
• Measure the voltage between IAT sensor No.2 terminal A (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
• Is the voltage B+?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for a possible short to power supply, then go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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6
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INSPECT IAT SENSOR NO.2
• Inspect the IAT sensor No.2.
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Replace the IAT sensor No.2, then go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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7
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INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Disconnect the PCM connector.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair or replace the terminal, then go to Step 9.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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INSPECT IAT SENSOR NO.2 CIRCUIT FOR OPEN CIRCUIT
• Turn the engine switch off.
• Inspect for continuity between the following terminals:
• Is there continuity?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace the wiring harness for a possible open circuit, then go to the next step.
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9
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VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0098 COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Start the engine.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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10
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
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No
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DTC troubleshooting completed.
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